District of Columbia statutes.
19-1307.05

Resignation of trustee.

(a)

A trustee may resign:

(1)

Upon at least 30 days’ notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the settlor, if living, and all cotrustees or, if there is no cotrustee, to the next designated successor trustee; or

(2)

With the approval of the court.

(b)

In approving a resignation, the court may issue orders and impose conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

(c)

Any liability of a resigning trustee or of any sureties on the trustee’s bond for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the trustee’s resignation

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

History

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 705 of the Uniform Trust Code.

Editor's Notes